Rhode Island statutes. Title 10 Courts and Civil Procedure — Procedure in Particular Actions
Chapter 20 State Environmental Rights

10-20-1.
Legislative findings and purpose.

The general assembly finds and declares that each person is entitled by right to the protection, preservation, and enhancement of air, water, land, and other natural resources located within the state and that each person has the responsibility to contribute to the protection, preservation, and enhancement thereof. The legislature further declares its policy to create and maintain within the state conditions under which man and nature can exist in productive harmony in order that present and future generations may enjoy clean air and water, productive land, and other natural resources with which this state has been endowed. Accordingly, it is in the public interest to provide an adequate civil remedy to protect air, water, land and other natural resources located within the state from pollution, impairment, or destruction.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-2.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, the following terms have the meanings given them in this section:

“Environmental control agency” shall mean any state agency which is empowered to protect, preserve, or enhance the natural resources of the state which includes, but is not limited to, the department of environmental management, the department of health, coastal resources management council, public utilities commission, the statewide planning program, and the water resources board.

“Environmental quality standard” shall mean any statute, ordinance, limitation, regulation, rule, order, license, stipulation, agreement, or permit of the state or any instrumentality, agency, or political subdivision thereof.

“Natural resources” shall include, but not be limited to, all mineral, animal, botanical, air, water, land, timber, soil, quietude, and recreational resources.

“Nonresident individual” means any natural person, or his or her personal representative, who is not domiciled or residing in the state when suit is commenced.

“Person” means any natural person, any state, municipality, or other governmental or political subdivision or other public agency or instrumentality, any public or private corporation, any partnership, firm, association, or other organization, any receiver, trustee, assignee, agent, or other legal representative of any of the foregoing, and any other entity.

“Pollution, impairment, or destruction” is any conduct by any person which violates, or is likely to violate, any environmental quality standard which was issued prior to the date the alleged violation occurred or is likely to occur or any conduct which materially adversely affects or is likely to materially adversely affect the environment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-3.
Civil actions — Environmental advocate — Notice — Intervention.

Any city or town may maintain an action in a court of competent jurisdiction against any person to enforce, or to restrain the violation of, any environmental quality standard which is designed to prevent or minimize pollution, impairment, or destruction of the environment.

Except in those instances where the conduct complained of constitutes a violation of an environmental quality standard which establishes a more specific standard for the control of pollution, impairment, or destruction of the environment, any city or town may maintain an action in any court of competent jurisdiction for declaratory and equitable relief against any other person for the protection of the environment, or the interest of the public therein, from pollution, impairment, or destruction.

Within the department of attorney general there shall be an environmental advocate, to be appointed by the attorney general from among the assistant and special assistant attorneys general.

The environmental advocate shall perform the following duties:

Maintain and/or intervene in civil actions authorized by this chapter.

Review periodically the procedures and environmental quality standards established by the state, or any instrumentality, agency, or subdivision thereof to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Review complaints of persons and investigate those which appear to constitute a violation of environmental quality standards, or any provision of this chapter.

Investigate and report to the director or person in charge of any state agency, instrumentality, or political subdivision any occurrences, conditions, or practices with respect to procedures, personnel, environmental quality standards, or facilities, which reflect inadequacies with reference to the provisions of this chapter.

To take all possible action, including but not limited to programs of public education, legislative advocacy, and formal legal action, to secure and insure compliance with the provisions of this chapter and any promulgated environmental quality standards.

No action may be commenced by a city or town pursuant to this act unless the municipality seeking to commence the suit shall, at least sixty (60) days prior to the commencement thereof, direct a written notice of the intention by certified mail to the environmental advocate, the appropriate environmental control agency or agencies, the governing body of the municipality in which the alleged conduct has or is likely to occur, and to the intended defendant; provided, however, that if the plaintiff can show that immediate and irreparable damage will probably result, the court may waive the foregoing requirement of notice.

In any action maintained under this section, the environmental advocate may intervene as a matter of right and may appoint outside counsel where as a result of the intervention he or she may represent conflicting or adverse interests. Other interested parties may be permitted to intervene on such terms as the court may deem just and equitable in order to effectuate the purposes and policies set forth in §

10-20-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-4.
Burden of proof.

In any action maintained under §

10-20-3

, where the subject of the action is conduct governed by an environmental quality standard promulgated or issued by an environmental control agency, whenever the plaintiff shall have made a prima facie showing that the conduct of the defendant violates or is likely to violate the environmental quality standard, the defendant may rebut the prima facie showing by the submission of evidence to the contrary.

In any other action maintained under §

10-20-3

, whenever the plaintiff shall have made a prima facie showing that the conduct of the defendant has, or is likely to cause the pollution, impairment or destruction of the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state, the defendant may rebut the prima facie showing by the submission of evidence to the contrary. The defendant may also show, by way of an affirmative defense, that there is no feasible, prudent, and economically viable alternative and the conduct at issue is consistent with the reasonable requirements of the public health, safety, and welfare.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-5.
Appointment of referee.

The court may appoint a referee, who shall be a disinterested person, to take testimony and make a report to the court in any such action.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-6.
Relief.

The court may grant declaratory relief, temporary and permanent equitable relief, or may impose such conditions upon a party as are necessary or appropriate to protect the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state from pollution, impairment, or destruction, considering the health, safety, and welfare of the public, and the availability of feasible, prudent, and economically viable alternatives.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-7.
Remand for administrative or licensing proceedings.

If administrative, licensing, or other similar proceedings are required to determine the legality of the defendants’ conduct, the court shall remand the parties to such proceedings. If administrative, licensing, or other similar proceedings are available to determine the legality of the defendants’ conduct, the court may remand the parties to such proceedings. In so remanding the parties the court may grant temporary equitable relief where appropriate as set forth in §

10-20-6

. In so remanding the parties the court shall retain jurisdiction of the cause pending completion thereof.

Upon completion of the proceedings, the court shall adjudicate the impact of the defendants’ conduct, program or product on the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state in accordance with §§

10-20-2

—

10-20-6

. In such adjudication, the court may order that additional evidence be taken to the extent necessary.

Where, as to any administrative, licensing, or other similar proceedings referred to in subsection (a), judicial review thereof is available, notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the court originally taking jurisdiction shall maintain jurisdiction for purposes of judicial review.

Nothing in this section shall be applicable to any action maintained under §

10-20-9

or to any appropriate administrative proceeding required thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-8.
Administrative and licensing proceedings — Intervention by environment advocate.

Except as otherwise provided in §

10-20-9

, in any administrative, licensing, or other similar proceedings and in any action for judicial review thereof which is made available by law, the environmental advocate may intervene on such terms as the court may deem just and equitable in order to effectuate the purposes and policies set forth in §

10-20-1

.

In any administrative, licensing, or other similar proceedings, the agency shall consider the alleged impairment, pollution, or destruction of the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state and no conduct shall be authorized or approved which does, or is likely to have, such effect so long as there is a feasible, prudent, and economically viable alternative consistent with the reasonable requirements of the public health, safety, and welfare.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-9.
Actions against state — Challenge to environmental quality standard — Remand to state agency — Intervention — Venue.

Civil actions. As hereinafter provided in this section, any city or town residing within the state or the environmental advocate may maintain a civil action in the superior court for declaratory or equitable relief against the state or any agency or instrumentality thereof where the nature of the action is a challenge to an environmental quality standard for which the applicable statutory appeal period has elapsed.

Burden of proof. In any action maintained under this section, the plaintiff shall have the burden of proving by a preponderance of the evidence that the environmental quality standard is substantially inadequate to protect the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state from pollution, impairment, or destruction.

Remand; judicial review. In any action maintained under this section, the superior court, upon showing by the plaintiff of those matters specified in subsection (b), may remand the parties to the state agency or instrumentality that promulgated the environmental quality standard which is the subject of the action, requiring the agency or instrumentality to institute the appropriate administrative proceedings to consider and make findings and an order on those matters specified in subsection (b). In so remanding the parties, the court may grant temporary equitable relief where appropriate to prevent irreparable injury to the air, water, land, or other natural resources located within the state. In so remanding the parties, the court shall retain jurisdiction for purposes of judicial review to determine whether the order of the agency is supported by a preponderance of the evidence. If plaintiff fails to establish a prima facie showing, the court shall dismiss the action.

Intervention. In any action maintained under this section, any person residing within the state or the environmental advocate may intervene as a party, provided that the person makes timely application to the superior court prior to the court’s remand of the action as specified in subsection (c).

Venue. Any action maintained under this section shall be brought in the superior court of Providence county.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-10.
Rights and remedies nonexclusive.

No existing civil or criminal remedy for any wrongful action shall be excluded or impaired by §

10-20-3

. The rights and remedies provided herein shall be in addition to any administrative, regulatory, statutory, or common law rights and remedies now or hereafter available.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.

10-20-11.
Short title.

Chapter 20 of this title may be cited as the “Rhode Island Environmental Rights Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1978, ch. 224, § 1.